New Jersey, session 222, A2555.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 2 of P.L.1989, c.326 (C.39:3-9b) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Each application for a driver's license, or a renewal thereof, required by R.S.39:3-10, shall contain the street address of the place of residence of the licensee at the time of application or renewal.  A post office box shall appear on a driver's license application only as part of a mailing address that is submitted by the licensee in addition to the street address of the licensee's residence; provided, however, the chief administrator, upon application, shall permit a person who was a victim of a violation of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10), N.J.S.2C:14-2, or P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et seq.)[,] ; who is a covered person as that term is defined pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1) and who has had an application for redaction or nondisclosure approved by the Director of the Office of Information Privacy pursuant to P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1 et al.); or who the chief administrator otherwise determines to have good cause, to use as a mailing address a post office box, an address other than the applicant's address, or other contact point.  A licensee whose last address appears on the records of the commission as a post office box shall change the address on the application for renewal to the street address of the licensee's residence and, if different from the street address, the licensee's mailing address unless the chief administrator has determined, pursuant to this section, that the licensee may use a post office box, an address other than the licensee's address, or other contact point as a mailing address. b.  Each application for an identification card issued by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, or a renewal thereof, pursuant to P.L.1980, c.47 (C.39:3-29.2 et seq.), shall contain the street address of the place of residence of the person at the time of application or renewal.  A post office box shall appear on a persons identification card application only as part of a mailing address that is submitted by the person in addition to the street address of the person's residence; provided, however, the chief administrator, upon application, shall permit a person who was a victim of a violation of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10), N.J.S.2C:14-2, or P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et seq.); who is a covered person as that term is defined pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1) and who has had an application for redaction or nondisclosure approved by the Director of the Office of Information Privacy pursuant to P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1 et al.); or who the chief administrator otherwise determines to have good cause, to use as a mailing address a post office box, an address other than the applicant's address, or other contact point.  A person whose last address appears on the records of the commission as a post office box shall change the address on the application for renewal to the street address of the person's residence and, if different from the street address, the person's mailing address unless the chief administrator has determined, pursuant to this section, that the person may use a post office box, an address other than the person's address, or other contact point as a mailing address. (cf: P.L.2019, c.271, s.20) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.